Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
In General
§ 57-1-25.
Municipal enterprises; election.

The governing board of any municipality desiring to enter into the plan herein authorized, after receiving a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the executive director, as provided by Sections 57-1-19 and 57-1-21, by resolution spread upon its minutes, shall declare its intention of entering into such plan, and shall call an election to be held in the manner now provided by law for holding county or municipal elections, and shall fix in such resolution a date upon which such an election shall be held in the municipality, of which not less than three (3) weeks’ notice shall be given by the clerk of such board, by a notice in a newspaper published in the municipality once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks preceding the same, or if no newspaper is published in the municipality, then by posting a notice for three (3) weeks preceding the election at three (3) public places in the municipality. At such election, all qualified electors of the municipality may vote, and the ballots used shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the purpose of the board to enter into the plan hereby authorized and to issue bonds therefor or to expend other municipal funds available together with the words “For the Proposed Enterprise,” and the words “Against the Proposed Enterprise,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) opposite his choice of the proposition. Should the election provided for herein result in favor of the proposed plan and bond issue or expenditure by at least sixty percent (60%) of those voting in favor of the plan, provided that the total number of votes cast in the election shall be not less than thirty percent (30%) of the qualified electors of the territory included in the proposal, then the governing board may proceed to exercise the authority granted under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 within three (3) years after the date of such election or within three (3) years after final, favorable determination of any litigation affecting the industrial plan or bond issue. If such election results unfavorably to the proposition, then no second or other election shall be ordered or held until the board shall determine that such election may be held.

Where the separate supervisors district or districts of a county indicate a desire to enter into the plan herein authorized, but not to affect the remainder of the county, then the board of supervisors shall direct the holding of such election only in the supervisors district or districts affected, and the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to carry out the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 for such separate supervisors district or districts.

In the event the proposal to be voted on at the election required herein includes bonds to be issued covering a supervisors district or districts, but not the entire county, includes a town or city of a population of more than five hundred, (500) as well as territory outside the corporate limits of such town or city and the proposed enterprise is to be located in such town or city or within one (1) mile of the corporate limits thereof, the qualified electors voting in the election residing outside the corporate limits of the town or city shall vote separately from those residing in such town or city.

All qualified electors shall vote at their usual voting places and in event the usual voting place of electors residing outside the corporate limits of such town or city is in such town or city, such elector shall vote in a separate ballot box provided for the purpose, and the officers holding the election shall make separate returns of the results of the vote of those residing within the town or city and those residing outside such town or city.

Unless sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors residing in such town or city voting in the election and sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors residing outside such town or city voting in such election shall vote for the proposed bond issue, computed and declared separately, the proposed bond issue shall be declared as disapproved.

It shall be the duty of the county election commissioners to provide necessary ballot boxes, separate voting lists containing the names of electors residing within and without the corporate limits of towns and cities when such is required by the proposal submitted, and records for the conduct of the election in accordance with the requirements of this section.

And in event the proposal to be voted on at the election required by this section includes bonds to be issued covering the entire county and the proposed industry is to be located in a town or city or within one (1) mile of the corporate limits thereof, the qualified electors voting in the election residing outside the corporate limits of the city or town, and whose regular voting place is within the corporate limits of the city or town, shall vote separately from those residing in such city or town, in separate ballot boxes to be provided for such purposes, and the votes so cast shall be counted separately.

At the election, unless sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors voting in the election and residing within the corporate limits of the city or town in which the proposed enterprise is to be located, or the town or city within one (1) mile of the proposed location of the enterprise shall vote for the proposed bond issue and sixty percent (60%) of all the other qualified electors of the county voting in the election shall vote for the proposed bond issue, computed and declared separately, the proposed bond issue shall be declared as disapproved. All qualified electors voting in such election shall vote at their usual voting precincts, and the county election commissioners shall provide necessary boxes, separate voting lists containing the names of electors residing within and without the corporate limits of the town or city wherein such enterprise is proposed to be located, or such town or city within one (1) mile of the proposed location of the enterprise, and records for the conduct of the election in accordance with the requirements of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-11; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 10; Laws, 1952, ch. 370; Laws, 1966, ch. 234, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-27.
Bonds and certain contracts subject to approval of executive director.

Before any bonds shall be issued under Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 by any municipality, or any contract shall be made to dispose of any public property hereunder acquired, the same must be approved in its entirety by the executive director, but such approval shall not in any way render the State of Mississippi liable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-12; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-29.
Issuance of municipal bonds; form; terms; tax levy.

A municipality, having been authorized by the executive director, as herein provided, may expend, for acquiring and operating such municipal enterprise under rules and regulations adopted by the executive director, any funds of the municipality then on hand or available and not already appropriated or necessary for other municipal purposes. A municipality, after the terms and conditions have been fixed by the executive director and with his approval, is hereby authorized from and after July 1, 1944, to issue bonds of such municipality for the purpose of effectuating the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 and promoting thereby the public policy of this state in bringing about the general welfare of its people. When, if and to the extent that a bond issue shall be approved by the executive director, then the same may be authorized by the governing authority of the municipality, and to secure such bond issue the municipality may mortgage or pledge property used and useful for the industrial enterprise; and the income therefrom, and confer upon the holders of such bonds the rights of a first mortgage bondholder. Such bond issue shall be first approved by the executive director, and thereafter shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the governing board of the municipality in such form and with such provisions, terms and conditions as may be fixed in the resolution or ordinance not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51. Present limitations on the amount of other bonds that may be issued by such municipality shall not apply to bonds issued hereunder other than as herein otherwise provided. All such bonds shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting, and shall be in sums not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or multiples thereof, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the president of the board of supervisors and the clerk of such board; or by the mayor and clerk of the municipality, and either of such clerks shall impress the county or municipal seal, as the case may be, upon each bond as it is issued. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the issuing resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president and clerk of the board of supervisors or such mayor and clerk, as the case may be. Every such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued, the total amount authorized to be issued, and each shall be made payable to bearer, and on request of any holder of such bonds the same may be registered as to principal by the clerk of the issuing board. The governing authorities shall annually levy a tax, or shall otherwise provide funds sufficient for paying interest on such bonds, and the bonds maturing within one (1) year and shall provide a sinking fund for the redemption of the bonds issued. Such bonds shall be issued maturing annually with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of the bonds, and not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature annually during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of the bonds, and the remainder to be amortized, as to the principal and interest, into approximately equal payments, one (1) payment to mature during each year for the remaining life of the bonds. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum rate of interest than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%).

The denomination, form and place of payment shall be fixed in the authorization therefor, and for the payment thereof the full faith, credit and resources of the municipality shall be pledged and a tax levied on all taxable property in the municipality, adequate to pay principal and interest on such bonds as the same fall due. Proceeds of such bonds shall be placed in the municipal treasury as a special fund and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose set forth in the original resolution, and any officer diverting or assisting to divert any such fund to any other purpose than the purpose originally set forth in the resolution of the governing authority of the municipality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, shall be punished accordingly, and shall also be liable both personally and on his official bond for such diversion, together with the costs of collection and reasonable attorney’s fees. The Attorney General is authorized to proceed by action for injunction or mandamus to require compliance with the original resolution by any officer or municipal board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-13; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 13; Laws, 1959, ch. 18; Laws, 1969, Ex. Sess. ch. 50, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 426; Laws, 1976, ch. 449; Laws, 1977, ch. 417; Laws, 1978, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 494; Laws, 1981, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 25; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 26; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 30; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-31.
Compensation of attorneys employed in issuance of bonds.

The board of supervisors of any county, or the governing authorities of any municipality or other political subdivision, shall have the power, in its discretion, to pay reasonable compensation to attorneys who may be employed by it in the matter of the issuance of bonds authorized to be issued by the provisions of this chapter, the drafting of all orders and resolutions in connection therewith, and passing upon the validity thereof. However, in no instance shall the attorney’s fees paid for the issuance or refunding of such bonds exceed the following amounts, to-wit:

On all such bond issues the attorney’s fees shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00); one-half percent (1/2%) of all over five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) and not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00); and one-fourth percent (1/4%) of all amounts in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00).

As used in this section, the term “municipalities” shall be construed to include any political subdivision of this state authorized to issue bonds under the authority contained in this chapter.

The limitations imposed herein shall not apply to any bond issue upon which a declaration of intent to issue bonds has heretofore been spread upon the minutes of the political subdivision desiring to issue same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-13.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 297, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 1, 1968).

§ 57-1-33.
Duties of executive director as to issuance of bonds.

When the executive director authorizes any municipality to issue bonds under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, he shall find and determine the total amount of bonds to be issued. He shall fix the maturity dates of the bonds consistent with the provisions of the aforesaid sections. He shall determine the amount of taxes necessary to be levied and collected annually to retire the bonds and pay interest coupons and to create a sinking fund for the payment of the bonds and interest so that the annual tax levy shall be uniform throughout the period for which the bonds are issued. He shall require the municipality to report annually to him payments made on the bonds and on interest, with the dates of payments, and to report the amount passed to the sinking fund, together with a list and amount of the bonds remaining outstanding for purposes of the aforesaid sections, and a failure so to do shall make the members of the governing board guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable accordingly. All of such reports shall be permanent public records of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-14; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 15; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-35.
Sale of bonds.

The bonds hereinabove provided for shall be sold by the governing authority of the municipality at not less than par and accrued interest at public sale held after notice of such sale published at least one (1) time at least five (5) days before such sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-15; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 18, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-37.
Issuance of additional bonds by municipality.

In the case any municipality shall have initiated any industry as provided in Sections 57-1-19 and 57-1-21, and thereafter said municipality lacks the requisite funds for completion by reason of emergency which was wholly unforeseen, then upon the approval of the commission, upon the same terms and conditions as herein set forth, additional bonds may be authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-16; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 17, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-39.
Exemption from taxation of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 and all interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation except gift and inheritance taxes. Necessary taxes levied and collection for the payment of these bonds and interest thereon shall not be considered or accounted in any limitation on the powers of the municipality to tax except as otherwise herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-17; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 18, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-41.
Investment of surplus sinking funds in bonds.

Any municipality having surplus sinking funds under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 may, in the discretion of the governing board of such municipality, invest said sinking funds by purchasing bonds of any county or municipality of this state, bonds of the State of Mississippi, or bonds issued by authority of the United States government, except drainage district bonds, provided, that the bonds so purchased shall mature prior to the time when the bonds payable out of the sinking fund hereunder shall fall due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-18; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 14, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-43.
Payment and retirement of bonds; use of surplus income.

Any municipality may use any sinking fund, reserve fund, or surplus fund to purchase any bond hereunder issued, and shall cancel and retire the same when, in the judgment of the governing authorities of such municipality, the interest of such municipality will be subserved thereby. Any surplus income from said enterprise arising through its operation or from its disposition, accruing to the municipality over and above the amount necessary to pay for repairs, replacements, bonds herein authorized which may be issued and interest thereon, may be applied by the governing board of the municipality upon any of the other outstanding debts or obligations of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-19; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 16, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-45.
Sale, lease, etc., of municipal enterprises.

The several municipalities when and to the extent authorized by the executive director pursuant hereto, are hereby authorized and empowered, if they so desire, by and through their governing board, to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of such enterprise or enterprises, in whole or in part, on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and are authorized, acting with the approval of the executive director by and through their respective governing boards, to transfer title or possession to such industry or to any property utilized therein, by warranty deed, lease, bill of sale, contract or other customary business instrument, in the same manner and to the same extent, when so thus authorized by the executive director, that any private corporation, association or person may now contract, with reference to such property of a similar nature, provided that such disposition shall not be made except by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the members elected to the governing body of such municipality, and all votes shall be of record. All income from any lease or contract for the operation or from the disposition of such industrial enterprise shall be paid into the bond sinking fund provided for the bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 for the retirement of such bonds and the interest thereon, and such income or proceeds shall not be used by the municipality for any other purpose except as to disposition of surplus income authorized above, and shall be subject to all of the provisions hereof relative to such sinking fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-20; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 19; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-47.
Municipal enterprises exempt from taxation.

All enterprises acquired, constructed or owned by any of said municipalities under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, are declared the public property of each of said municipalities, and as such, shall not be subject to taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-21; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 20, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-49.
Assistance by port authorities.

Any port commission or authority created by law, operating in any county or municipality of this state, is authorized and empowered to assist and cooperate with such county or municipality to effectuate the purposes of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-22; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 21, eff on and after July 1, 1944.

§ 57-1-51.
Construction of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

The provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 shall not repeal or impair any law now in effect, except as therein specifically provided, but shall exist as a separate, several, independent, additional and cumulative method for giving to the people of Mississippi the fulfillment of the public policy of encouraging the promotion of economic development of new and existing “enterprises.” Nor shall the aforesaid sections or any part thereof repeal any of the provisions of private or special municipal charters, nor affect, limit or restrict the right of any municipality, now operating under special charter, to amend said charter pursuant to the provisions of Section 21-17-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, which section shall apply to Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-04; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 5; Laws, 1958, ch. 531, § 1.

§ 57-1-52.
Creation of Department of Economic and Community Development; organization; executive director; division directors.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development, whose principal offices shall be located in Jackson, Mississippi.

The Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development shall be organized into the following offices:

Office of Economic Development;

Office of Community Development;

Office of Support Services.

The department shall be headed by an executive director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the executive director shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate. The executive director may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department’s lawful functions.

The executive director of the department shall appoint heads of offices, who shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director. The executive director shall have the authority to organize the offices established by subsection (2) of this section as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 37; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 57-1-53.
Department designated agency for receipt of federal funds; coordination of functions relating to economic development and tourism.

The department is designated as the single state agency to receive and expend any federal funds made available for matters within the jurisdiction of the department.

The department shall coordinate all functions of state government related to economic development and tourism within the jurisdiction of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 40; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 57-1-54.
Transfer of powers and duties of Department of Economic and Community Development to Mississippi Development Authority.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall be the Department of Economic and Community Development and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development and wherever the term “Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development,” “Department of Economic and Community Development,” “Mississippi Department of Economic Development” or “Department of Economic Development” appears in any law the same shall mean the Mississippi Development Authority. The Mississippi Development Authority may continue to refer to itself as the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development for as long as it may deem necessary. The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority may assign to the appropriate divisions such powers and duties as he deems appropriate to carry out its lawful duties.

Nothing in the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Laws, 1989, Chapter 544] shall be construed to eliminate or change in any manner the duties, functions or operations of the planning and development districts heretofore created by executive order of the Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 38; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-1-55.
General powers and duties of Department of Economic and Community Development.

The Department of Economic and Community Development shall have the following general powers and duties: To develop and manage programs which enhance the climate for economic growth through assistance to private sector businesses, local communities and individuals, and through an extensive national and international marketing effort.

The Department of Economic and Community Development shall have the following general powers and duties with respect to economic development:

To plan, supervise and direct an active program of solicitation of industries to locate within the state;

To prepare, maintain and disseminate information which is needed by companies in evaluating site locations;

To consult with, advise and assist prospective industries wishing to locate within the state;

To encourage new or expanding industries, which will add to the economy, to locate within the state;

To maintain a coordinated liaison function with other development groups, including state and federal agencies, and planning and development districts, utility companies, chambers of commerce and railroads;

To assist communities and counties within the state in preparation for economic growth;

To assist new and existing business and industry and encourage their development and expansion;

To plan and conduct a nationwide advertising program promoting the state to prospective industry. Any contract entered into for such purposes shall be advertised, bid and accepted in accordance with the same procedure as prescribed for the advertisement and acceptance of bids for the purchase of commodities and contracts for public purchases under Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972;

To work with economic development agencies of the federal government in areas of industrial development and provide information to industrial prospects regarding the availability of federal funds and assistance;

To work with the Department of Corrections, pursuant to the provisions of Section 47-5-501 et seq., in identifying and evaluating acceptable industries and businesses and in acting as an agent of the Department of Corrections by communicating with such concerns and aggressively soliciting their participation in the Correctional Industries Work Program;

To perform related work as required;

To disseminate information about financial and other programs of the Department of Economic and Community Development that will assist in the creation or expansion of industries processing wood products in this state;

To market processed and raw agricultural products domestically and abroad;

To aid in the establishment of business incubation centers by private business interests, not for profit corporations, and/or governmental entities. The department may provide funds by contract for the establishment of business incubation centers and may contract for space in which business incubation centers will be located. Business incubation centers are defined as facilities and support services that encourage the establishment of successful small businesses by providing a short-term sheltered environment. The department may solicit and accept grants and other financial aid or support from private or public sources to aid in the development of business incubation centers. In addition, advice and assistance to established business incubation centers may be provided by the department; and

To employ licensed real estate brokers and appraisers necessary for the industrial development of any real estate under the ownership or control of the Department of Economic and Community Development. Any contract entered into for such purposes shall be advertised, bid and accepted in accordance with the same procedure as prescribed for the advertisement and acceptance of bids for the purchase of commodities and contracts for public purchases under Chapter 7, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 409, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 27; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 41; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 44; Laws, 1999, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1999.).

§ 57-1-56.
Occupational Information Coordinating Committee.

The Occupational Information Coordinating Committee shall be located within the Department of Economic and Community Development and shall develop and implement an occupational information system for vocational education, employment and training programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 57-1-57.
Study to determine existence of disparity in number of qualified minority contractors.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall conduct and prepare, or shall contract for the preparation of, a study to determine if there is a significant statistical disparity in the total number of qualified minority contractors of goods and services doing business in the State of Mississippi and the actual number of such minority contractors with whom the State of Mississippi, or with whom a prime contractor with the State of Mississippi, has contracted to provide goods and services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1 § 58, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-1-58.
Policy of the Mississippi Development Authority with regard to programs of diversity in contracting for entities using funds made available under Sections 1 through 37 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session.

It is the policy of the Mississippi Development Authority and the Mississippi Development Authority is authorized to accommodate and support any entity using funds authorized and made available under Sections 1 through 37 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session that wishes to have a program of diversity in contracting, and/or that wishes to do business with or cause its prime contractor to do business with Mississippi companies, including those companies that are small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. The term “socially and economically disadvantaged individuals” shall have the meaning ascribed to that term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; except that women shall be presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged individuals for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 57-1-59.
General powers and duties of Mississippi Development Authority with respect to tourism.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have the following general powers and duties with respect to tourism:

To promote and advertise the image of Mississippi both within and without the boundaries of this state;

To promote and advertise fairs and similar activities of interest to tourists and the traveling public;

To promote and advertise the use of wildlife and natural areas by tourists and the traveling public;

To promote and advertise the use of state recreational and park facilities by tourists and the traveling public;

To promote and advertise all resources of the State of Mississippi as attractions to tourists and the traveling public;

To develop for all agencies of state government the necessary promotional and advertising materials needed to promote all facilities and programs which may be of interest to travelers and tourists;

To maintain an educational awareness program for the citizens of the state to constantly encourage increased development of activities of interest to tourists and the traveling public;

To develop and maintain an information services system to adequately guide tourists and the traveling public within the boundaries of the state;

To develop and maintain an extensive media program to adequately inform the national and international consumer about Mississippi;

To enter into contracts and other agreements with local tourism commissions or similar entities for the purpose of developing regional strategies for tourism promotion. The Mississippi Development Authority, in conjunction with the formulation of regional strategies for tourism promotion, may require that local tourism commissions or similar entities enter into agreements with the authority as a condition for receiving any state grants to promote tourism; and

To develop programs and projects promoting the state’s heritage, history, culture, literature and arts, including the positive recovery of the state after damages caused by natural disasters, and demonstrating the state’s attractiveness as a tourism destination for those and other reasons.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 42; Laws, 1990, ch. 502, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2010.).

§ 57-1-60.
Grants to finance, promote and advertise local tourist attractions.

The Department of Economic and Community Development, in its discretion, may establish a program of grants to be matched by tourism entities in the state to finance, promote and advertise local tourist attractions. Monies committed to the program of grants shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of a fiscal year. Any program of grants established under this section shall be in addition to those grants authorized by Chapter 27, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 592, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1993).

§ 57-1-61.
Transfer of functions of travel and tourism department of agricultural and industrial board.

The staff and resources of the travel and tourism department of the agricultural and industrial board shall be, and are hereby transferred to the department of economic development.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 10, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

§ 57-1-63.
Transfer of powers and duties of state agencies relating to promotion and advertising of tourism.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all powers and duties of any state agency relating to the promotion and advertising of tourism which are not provided for by statute shall be transferred to and vested in the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-64.
Selling advertising and tourism promotional information through various marketing outlets; Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund created.

The Mississippi Development Authority is authorized to sell advertising and other tourism promotional information through the Mississippi Development Authority Internet website and other marketing outlets, and to enter into agreements with tourism associations and similar entities for the purpose of making and facilitating sales through the use of such entities. Revenues received from such sales shall be placed into the special fund created in subsection (2) of this section.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund which shall consist of monies from any source designated for deposit into the fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund may be used by the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of paying costs incurred in connection with the purchase of Internet advertising and other promotional information and materials related to Mississippi tourism resources and activities.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 2011.).

§ 57-1-64.1
Mississippi Tourism Association Marketing Advisory Board created; composition.

There is hereby created a Mississippi Tourism Association Marketing Advisory Board to assist the Mississippi Development Authority in the planning of initiatives for advertising and promoting tourism in Mississippi.

The advisory board shall be composed of the following members:

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Tourism Association; and

The members of the Mississippi Tourism Association Board of Directors, composed through the bylaws of the Mississippi Tourism Association as being geographically and ethnically diverse members from the five (5) tourism regions designated as the Hills, the Delta, the Capital/River, the Pines and the Coastal regions of Mississippi, and three (3) at-large members.

Members of the advisory board may not be compensated for the performance of their duties.

The advisory board will give input and advice to the Mississippi Development Authority’s Tourism Division on marketing and advertising planning, but shall have no executive powers at the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.